toy.foma
define RewriteSubordinative %{%.sf%.%} i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" k u       -> %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" a n         .o. 
                            %{%.sf%.%} i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t e n "^" -> %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" n g         .o. 
                            %{%.sf%.%} i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t a       -> %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" a m t a     .o. 
                            %{%.sf%.%} i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t u n g   -> %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" a m t u n g .o. 
                            %{%.sf%.%} i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^"           -> %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a                 .o.
                         %{%.f%.%} n g i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" k u       -> %{%.f%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" a n         .o. 
                         %{%.f%.%} n g i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t e n "^" -> %{%.f%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" n g         .o. 
                         %{%.f%.%} n g i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t a       -> %{%.f%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" a m t a     .o. 
                         %{%.f%.%} n g i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t u n g   -> %{%.f%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" a m t u n g .o. 
                         %{%.f%.%} n g i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^"           -> %{%.f%.%} n g u "^" n a                 .o.
                             %{%.c%.%} i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" k u       -> %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" a n         .o. 
                             %{%.c%.%} i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t e n "^" -> %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" n g         .o. 
                             %{%.c%.%} i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t a       -> %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" a m t a     .o. 
                             %{%.c%.%} i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t u n g   -> %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" a m t u n g .o. 
                             %{%.c%.%} i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^"           -> %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a                 .o.
                               "^" i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" k u       -> "^" %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" a n         .o. 
                               "^" i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t e n "^" -> "^" %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" n g         .o. 
                               "^" i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t a       -> "^" %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" a m t a     .o. 
                               "^" i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t u n g   -> "^" %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a "^" a m t u n g .o. 
                               "^" i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^"           -> "^" %{%.m%.%} n g u "^" n a                 .o.
                                   n g i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" k u       ->           n g u "^" n a "^" a n         .o. 
                                   n g i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t e n "^" ->           n g u "^" n a "^" n g         .o. 
                                   n g i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t a       ->           n g u "^" n a "^" a m t a     .o. 
                                   n g i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t u n g   ->           n g u "^" n a "^" a m t u n g .o. 
                                   n g i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^"           ->           n g u "^" n a                 .o. 
                      %{%.at%.%} n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" k u       -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" a n         .o.
                      %{%.at%.%} n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t e n "^" -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" n g         .o.
                      %{%.at%.%} n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t a       -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" a m t a     .o.
                      %{%.at%.%} n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t u n g   -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" a m t u n g .o.
                      %{%.at%.%} n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^"           -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a                 .o.
                    %{%.at%.%} n e g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" k u       -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" a n         .o.
                    %{%.at%.%} n e g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t e n "^" -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" n g         .o.
                    %{%.at%.%} n e g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t a       -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" a m t a     .o.
                    %{%.at%.%} n e g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t u n g   -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" a m t u n g .o.
                    %{%.at%.%} n e g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^"           -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a                 .o.
                       %{%.m%.%} n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" k u       -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" a n         .o.
                       %{%.m%.%} n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t e n "^" -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" n g         .o.
                       %{%.m%.%} n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t a       -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" a m t a     .o.
                       %{%.m%.%} n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t u n g   -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" a m t u n g .o.
                       %{%.m%.%} n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^"           -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a                 .o.
                                 n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" k u       -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" a n         .o.
                                 n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t e n "^" -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" n g         .o.
                                 n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t a       -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" a m t a     .o.
                                 n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^" t u n g   -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a "^" a m t u n g .o.
                                 n g h i %{t%} e "*" "*" "^" %{SUBR%} "^"           -> %{%.m%.%} g p e "^" n a                 .o.
                                                                         %{SUBR%}   -> %{%.at%.%} %{%.f%.%} l u                ;


define ResolveDemAnaphor "[Anaphor]" -> t a z || _ "^" i       .o.
                         "[Anaphor]" -> t     || _ "^" V V     .o.
                         "[Anaphor]" -> t a   || _ "^" [V | m] .o.
                         "[Anaphor]" -> t e   || _ "^" s       ,,
                         "[Anaphor]" ->   e   || _ "^" s       .o.
                         "[Anaphor]" -> t e s || _ "^" C       ,,
                         "[Anaphor]" ->   e s || _ "^" C       ;


!------------------
! MODIFY -TE RULES
!------------------

! what is %{K%}?
!  the conditional mood marker is @~sf–(g)k which is nearly identical to the derivational morpheme @~sf–(g)ka/ke.
!  all special -te becomes -l and only -l before the derivational morpheme @~sf–ka/ke [Jacobson (2001) p.72],
!  but some special -te (weakly special -te) become -l, -s, or -t before the conditional mood marker [p.92].
!  we introduce %{K%} in the conditional mood marker to differentiate these environments -> @~sf–(g)%{K%}

define SpecialTE %{t%} e ("*") "*" -> l ||         _ "^" %{%.at%.%}           ,,  ! special -te always changes to -l
                                 e -> 0 || V %{t%} _ "*" "^" %{%.at%.%} %{K%} .o. ! but in the conditional mood,
                         %{t%} "*" -> t                                       ,   !   weakly special -te can also 
                         %{t%} "*" -> s ||       V _ "*" "^" %{%.at%.%} %{K%} .o. !   change to -t or -s
                             %{K%} -> k                                       ;


define UnmarkSpecialTE "*" -> 0 ;


define ISuffixTE e -> 0 || %{t%} _ "^" %{%.at%.%} i .o.
             %{t%} -> s ||       _ "^" %{%.at%.%} i ;


define LabialTE e   -> 0     || V %{t%} _ "^" %{%.at%.%} [ m | v ]  .o. ! labial -m and -v 
                n   -> n n   ||         _ %{t%} e "^" %{%.at%.%} m  .o. !   delete -e if -Vte
                l   -> l l   ||         _ %{t%} e "^" %{%.at%.%} m  .o. !   delete -te if -Cte
                g h -> g h h ||         _ %{t%} e "^" %{%.at%.%} m  .o. !   and the resulting
                  v -> f     || C %{t%} e "^" %{%.at%.%} _          .o. !   consonant cluster devoices
            %{t%} e -> 0     ||       C _         "^" %{%.at%.%} m  ;   ! [Jacobson (2001) p.177]


define ApicalTE y   -> s                                                       ,   ! apical -y [Jacobson (2001) p.177]
                n   -> n n                                                     ,   ! apical -n and -r [Jacobson (2001) p.31 & p.90]
                r   -> r r     ||       %{t%} e "^" %{%.at%.%} _               .o. !   the only consonants before -te that double
                g   -> g g                                                     ,   !   to show voicelessness are -g, -l, -gh
                l   -> l l                                                     ,
                g h -> g h h   || _ %{t%} e "^" %{%.at%.%} [ n | r ]           .o.
                l   -> l l     ||       %{t%} e "^" %{%.at%.%} _ [ V | C - l ] .o. ! apical -l [Jacobson (2001) p.70]
                g h -> e g h h || C %{t%} e "^" %{%.at%.%} l l _               .o. ! for postbase @–lghii
               [..] -> e       ||   %{t%} e "^" %{%.at%.%} n n _ g h           .o. ! for postbase @–nghhagh, contemporative mood
               [..] -> e       || C %{t%} e "^" %{%.at%.%} n n _ q             ;   ! for postbase @–nqigte


define VelarTE %{t%} e -> 0  ||               _ "^" %{%.at%.%} k a g h a %{g%} h .o. ! postbase @kaghaq
                     e -> 0  ||       V %{t%} _ "^" %{%.at%.%} k                 .o. ! [Jacobson (2001) p.177]
                 %{t%} -> t,
                 %{t%} -> s  ||             V _ "^" %{%.at%.%} k                 .o. ! e.g. tuqutkuvgu, tuquskuvgu
            %{%.at%.%} -> 0  || C %{t%} e "^" _ k                                ;   ! e.g. qelpeghtekuvgu


define DropTE %{t%} e -> 0 || _ "^" %{%.at%.%} .o.
            %{%.at%.%} -> 0                    ;


!----------------
! CLEAN-UP RULES
!----------------

define MatchVoicing t [z | y] -> s                                              .o. ! tz / ty = s
                            y -> s   ||                     _ [ k | q | g h h ] .o. ! [Jacobson (2001) p.66] e.g. paasghu
                            y -> s   || [ k | q | g h h w ] _                   .o.
                            z -> s   ||          Stop ("^") _                   .o. ! [Jacobson (2001) p.51] e.g. qiyaaqsin
                            k -> q   ||                 g h _                   .o.
                          g h -> 0   ||                   C _ q                 .o. ! e.g. itegh[Intr][Cond][3Sg]:iitghqan -> iitqan
                            v -> f   ||                     _ ("^") Stop        .o. ! [Jacobson (2001) p.58] e.g. kuufkaq
                            v -> f   ||          Stop ("^") _                   .o. ! e.g. taaqfik
                            w -> w h ||       [ C - h | V ] _ t                 ;   ! [Badten (2008) p.682] 


define BaseFinalEndings %{t%} e -> n   ||               V _     "^" .#. , 
                        %{t%} e -> t a                                  .o.
                              e -> a   ||                 _     "^" .#. .o.
                              w -> k w || [C - h | %{k%}] _     "^" .#. .o.
                            g h -> q   ||                 _ (w) "^" .#. .o.
                        %{g%} h -> q   ||                 _     "^" .#. .o.
                              g -> k   ||                 _     "^" .#. .o.
          [ %{t%} | t ] ("^") z -> s                                    ;   ! [Jacobson (2001) p.51] e.g. ~f(t)zin
